Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-6,320
Snowmobiles; operate, defined.

For purposes of sections 60-6,320 to 60-6,346, operate means to ride in or on and control the operation of a snowmobile.

Laws 1971, LB 330, § 1;

Laws 1972, LB 1149, § 1;

R.S.1943, (1988), § 60-2001;

Laws 1993, LB 121, § 392;

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 416;

Laws 2005, LB 274, § 248.